Illinois, session 104th, SB220.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Military Leave Act is amended by changing 5Sections 1, 5, 15, and 20 and by adding Section 12 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 151/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Family 8Military Leave Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-589, eff. 8-15-05.) 10    (820 ILCS 151/5)11    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:12    "Authorized provider" means an individual or group 13recognized by the armed forces, who are not service members or 14employees of the United States government and who augment the 15uniformed members of a military funeral honors detail. 16"Authorized provider" may include, but is not limited to, 17veterans service organizations, trained volunteers of the 18Reserve Officer Training Corps, honor guards, and other 19appropriate individuals and organizations that support the 20rendering of military funeral honors. 21    "Employee" means any person who may be permitted, 22required, or directed by an employer in consideration of   SB0220 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07180 SPS 17217 b1direct or indirect gain or profit to engage in any employment. 2"Employee" does include an independent contractor. "Employee" 3includes an employee of a covered employer who has been 4employed by the same employer for at least 12 months, and has 5been employed for at least 1,250 hours of service during the 612-month period immediately preceding the commencement of the 7leave.8    "Employee benefits" means all benefits, other than salary 9and wages, provided or made available to employees by an 10employer and includes group life insurance, health insurance, 11disability insurance and pensions, regardless of whether 12benefits are provided by a policy or practice of an employer. 13    "Employer" means (1) any person, partnership, corporation, 14association, or other business entity; and (2) the State of 15Illinois, municipalities and other units of local government. 16    "Family military leave" means leave requested by an 17employee who is the spouse, parent, child, or grandparent of a 18person called to military service lasting longer than 30 days 19with the State or United States pursuant to the orders of the 20Governor or the President of the United States. 21    "Funeral honors detail" means an honor guard detail 22provided for the funeral of any veteran in compliance with 10 23U.S.C. 1491 and any associated federal regulations. A "funeral 24honors detail" consists of at least 2 members of the U.S. Armed 25Forces, one of whom is from the deceased veteran's service 26branch, with the remainder of the detail consisting of members   SB0220 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07180 SPS 17217 b1of the armed forces, whether retired or not, or members of an 2authorized provider. The funeral honors detail performs at the 3funeral a ceremony that includes the folding of a United 4States flag and presentation of the flag to the veteran's 5family and the playing of "Taps". 6    "Veteran" means any person honorably discharged from, or 7released under honorable conditions from active service in, 8the armed forces who served as an eligible member. 9    "Veterans service organization" means an organization that 10is chartered under the Veteran Service Organizations State 11Charter Act or an organization that has been Congressionally 12chartered as a Patriotic and National Organization under 36 13U.S.C. Subtitle II, Part B. 14(Source: P.A. 96-1417, eff. 1-1-11.) 15    (820 ILCS 151/12 new)16    Sec. 12. Paid leave for funeral honors details.17    (a) This Section applies to employers employing 51 or more 18employees.19    (b) An employee may use up to 8 hours per calendar month to 20participate in a funeral honors detail, up to a total of 40 21hours per calendar year, or more if authorized by his or her 22employer or if provided for in a collective bargaining 23agreement.24    (c) An employee qualifies for paid leave under this 25Section if the employee:  SB0220 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07180 SPS 17217 b1        (1) is trained to participate in a funeral honors 2    detail at the funeral of a veteran; and3        (2) is either:4            (A) a retired or active member of the armed forces 5        of the United States or a member of a reserve component 6        of the armed forces of the United States, including 7        the Illinois National Guard; or8            (B) an authorized provider, or a registered member 9        of a nonprofit or other organization that is an 10        authorized provider, including a member of a veterans 11        service organization.12    (d) An employee taking funeral honors detail leave shall 13give his or her employer reasonable notice, as is practicable.14    (e) An employer may request a confirmation from the 15relevant veterans service organization that dispatched the 16employee to the funeral honors detail, or any official notice 17provided to the employee in relation to the funeral honors 18detail, that can be used as proof of the employee's 19participation in the detail.20    (f) An employee that takes leave under this Section may do 21so in lieu of, and without having exhausted, his or her 22vacation leave, personal leave, compensatory leave, or any 23other leave that may be granted to the employee, including 24sick leave and disability leave.25    (g) An employer of an employee that takes leave under this 26Section must pay the employee his or her regular rate of pay   SB0220 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07180 SPS 17217 b1for the leave taken to participate in a funeral honors detail.2    (h) An employer may deny a request for leave under this 3Section if granting the request would, at an independent 4living facility, assisted living facility, nursing home 5facility, or other similar congregate care facility or at a 6facility providing 24/7 care, reduce staffing levels to below 7the established minimum or impair the safe and efficient 8operations of the facility. An employer shall not deny leave 9under this subsection if doing so violates the terms of an 10applicable collective bargaining agreement. 11    (820 ILCS 151/15)12    Sec. 15. Employee benefits protection. 13    (a) Any employee who exercises the right to family 14military leave or funeral honors detail leave under this Act, 15upon expiration of the leave, shall be entitled to be restored 16by the employer to the position held by the employee when the 17leave commenced or to a position with equivalent seniority 18status, employee benefits, pay and other terms and conditions 19of employment. This Section does not apply if the employer 20proves that the employee was not restored as provided in this 21Section because of conditions unrelated to the employee's 22exercise of rights under this Act. 23    (b) During any family military leave or funeral honors 24detail leave taken under this Act, the employer shall make it 25possible for employees to continue their benefits at the   SB0220 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07180 SPS 17217 b1employee's expense. The employer and employee may negotiate 2for the employer to maintain benefits at the employer's 3expense for the duration of the leave. 4(Source: P.A. 94-589, eff. 8-15-05.) 5    (820 ILCS 151/20)6    Sec. 20. Effect on existing employee benefits. 7    (a) Taking family military any leave under this Act shall 8not result in the loss of any employee benefit accrued before 9the date on which the leave commenced. 10    (b) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect an 11employer's obligation to comply with any collective bargaining 12agreement or employee benefit plan that provides greater leave 13rights to employees than the rights provided under this Act. 14    (c) The family military leave rights provided under this 15Act shall not be diminished by any collective bargaining 16agreement or employee benefit plan. 17    (d) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to affect or 18diminish the contract rights or seniority status of any other 19employee of any employer covered under this Act. 20(Source: P.A. 94-589, eff. 8-15-05.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.